Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 18, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 259, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 18), is amended to read as follows:
Section 18. A. Persons authorized to file a motion for
expungement, as provided herein in this section, must shall be
within one of the following categories:
1. The person has been acquitted;
2. The conviction was reversed with instructions to dismiss by
an appellate court of competent jurisdiction, or an appellate court
of competent jurisdiction reversed the conviction and the
prosecuting agency subsequently dismissed the charge;
3. The factual innocence of the person was established by the
use of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) evidence subsequent to
conviction, including a person who has been released from prison at
the time innocence was established;
4. The person has received a full pardon by the Governor for
the crime for which the person was sentenced;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 2

5. The person was arrested and no charges of any type,
including charges for an offense different than that for which the
person was originally arrested, are filed and the statute of
limitations has expired or the prosecuting agency has declined to
file charges;
6. The person was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time
the offense was committed and the person has received a full pardon
for the offense;
7. The person was charged with one or more misdemeanor or
felony crimes, all charges have been dismissed, the person has never
been convicted of a felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are
pending against the person and the statute of limitations for
refiling the charge or charges has expired or the prosecuting agency
confirms that the charge or charges will not be refiled; provided,
however, this category shall not apply to charges that have been
dismissed following the completion of a deferred judgment or delayed
sentence;
8. The person was charged with a misdemeanor, the charge was
dismissed following the successful completion of a deferred judgment
or delayed sentence, the person has never been convicted of a
felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are pending against the
person and at least one (1) year has passed since the charge was
dismissed;
9. The person was charged with a nonviolent felony offense not
listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the
charge was dismissed following the successful completion of a
deferred judgment or delayed sentence, the person has never been
convicted of a felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are pending
against the person and at least five (5) years have passed since the
charge was dismissed;
10. The person was convicted of a misdemeanor offense, the
person was sentenced to a fine less than Five Hundred One Dollars
($501.00) without a term of imprisonment or a suspended sentence,
the fine has been paid or satisfied by time served in lieu of the
fine, the person has not been convicted of a felony and no felony or
misdemeanor charges are pending against the person;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 3

11. The person was convicted of a misdemeanor offense, the
person was sentenced to a term of imprisonment, a suspended sentence
or a fine in an amount greater than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
the person has not been convicted of a felony, no felony or
misdemeanor charges are pending against the person and at least five
(5) years have passed since the end of the last misdemeanor
sentence;
12. The person was convicted of a nonviolent felony offense not
listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the
person has not been convicted of any other felony, the person has
not been convicted of a separate misdemeanor in the last seven (7)
years, no felony or misdemeanor charges are pending against the
person and at least five (5) years have passed since the completion
of the sentence for the felony conviction;
13. The person was convicted of not more than two felony
offenses, none of which is a felony offense listed in Section 13.1
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes or any offense that would
require the person to register pursuant to the provisions of the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, no felony or misdemeanor charges are
pending against the person, and at least ten (10) years have passed
since the completion of the sentence for the felony conviction;
14. The person was charged with not more than two felony
offenses and the charges were dismissed following the successful
completion of a deferred judgment or delayed sentence, none of which
were felony offenses listed in Section 13.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes or would require the person to register pursuant
to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, no felony
or misdemeanor charges are pending against the person, and at least
ten (10) years have passed since the charges were dismissed;
15. The person has been charged or arrested or is the subject
of an arrest warrant for a crime that was committed by another
person who has appropriated or used the person’s name or other
identification without the person’s consent or authorization; or
15. 16. The person was convicted of a nonviolent felony offense
not listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes which
was subsequently reclassified as a misdemeanor under Oklahoma law,
the person is not currently serving a sentence for a crime in this
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 4

state or another state, at least thirty (30) days have passed since
the completion or commutation of the sentence for the crime that was
reclassified as a misdemeanor, any restitution ordered by the court
to be paid by the person has been satisfied in full, and any
treatment program ordered by the court has been successfully
completed by the person, including any person who failed a treatment
program which resulted in an accelerated or revoked sentence that
has since been successfully completed by the person or the person
can show successful completion of a treatment program at a later
date. Persons seeking an expungement of records under the
provisions of this paragraph may utilize the expungement forms
provided in Section 18a of this title.
B. For purposes of Section 18 et seq. of this title:
1. “Expungement”, “expungement” means the sealing of criminal
records, as well as any public civil record, involving actions
brought by and against the State of Oklahoma arising from the same
arrest, transaction or occurrence. A fully sealed expunged record
shall not be available to the public or to law enforcement. Such
records may be retained in the state criminal history repository but
shall only be accessible to designated employees of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation for research and statistical purposes.
A partially sealed expunged record shall not be available to the
public but shall be available to law enforcement agencies for law
enforcement purposes; and
2. “Single-source record” means a criminal history record from
this state that consists of an Oklahoma arrest record only. A
single-source record shall not contain any arrest from another
state, a federal arrest, or an entry into the National Sex Offender
Registry or a National Crime Information Center (NCIC)
wanted/warrant entry.
C. Beginning three (3) years after November 1, 2022, and
subject to the availability of funds, individuals with clean slate
eligible arrest records shall be eligible to have their arrest
records sealed automatically. For purposes of Section 18 et seq. of
this title, “clean slate eligible arrest record” shall mean an
arrest record where each charge within the record meets one of the
following criteria:
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 5

1. Records described in paragraph 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 14 or 15 of
subsection A of this section;
2. Records described in paragraph 7 of subsection A of this
section where the prosecuting agency has declined to file charges
and the record is an Oklahoma single-source record; or
3. Records described in paragraph 8, 10, or 11 of subsection A
of this section where the record is an Oklahoma single-source
record.
D. For purposes of seeking an expungement under the provisions
of paragraph 10, 11, 12 or 13 of subsection A of this section,
offenses arising out of the same transaction or occurrence shall be
treated as one conviction and offense.
E. D. Records expunged pursuant as a result of a petition filed
and subsequently ordered by the court to paragraphs 4, 8, 9, 10, 11,
12, 13, 14, and 15, and 16 of subsection A of this section shall be
partially sealed so that such records are not available to the
public but remain available to law enforcement agencies for law
enforcement purposes. Records expunged pursuant to paragraphs 1, 2,
3, 5, 6, or 7 of subsection A of this section shall be sealed and
not available to the public or to law enforcement; provided,
however, such records may be used by the Statistical Analysis Center
of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for research purposes.
Records expunged pursuant to paragraphs 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 13,
and 14 of subsection A of this section shall be admissible in any
subsequent criminal prosecution to prove the existence of a prior
conviction or prior deferred judgment without the necessity of a
court order requesting the unsealing of the records. Records
expunged pursuant to paragraph 4, 6, 12, or 13 of subsection A of
this section may also include the sealing of Pardon and Parole Board
records related to an application for a pardon. Such records shall
be sealed to the public but not to the Pardon and Parole Board.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18b of Title 22, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section and Section 4 of this act:
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 6

1. “Clean slate eligible record” means a record arising on or
after January 1, 1980, where each offense listed within the record
meets one of the following criteria:
a. records described in paragraph 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, or 15 of
subsection A of Section 18 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
b. records described in paragraph 5 of subsection A of
Section 18 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes where
the prosecuting agency has declined to file charges
and the record is an Oklahoma single-source record,
c. records described in paragraphs 7 or 8 of subsection A
of Section 18 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes
where the record is an Oklahoma single-source record,
d. the person was convicted of a felony offense pursuant
to paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 2-402 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the person is not
currently serving a sentence for a crime in this
state, at least five (5) years have passed since the
end of the last felony or misdemeanor sentence, and
the record is a single-source record, or
e. the person was convicted of a misdemeanor offense, the
person has not been convicted of a felony, no felony
or misdemeanor charges are pending against the person,
five(5) years have passed since the end of the last
misdemeanor sentence, and the record is a single-
source record;
2. “Expungement” means the sealing of criminal records, as well
as any public civil record, involving actions brought by and against
the State of Oklahoma arising from the same arrest, transaction or
occurrence, including court records. A fully sealed expunged record
shall not be available to the public or to law enforcement. Such
records may be retained in the state criminal history repository but
shall only be accessible to designated employees of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation for research and statistical purposes.
A partially sealed expunged record shall not be available to the
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 7

public but shall be available to law enforcement agencies for law
enforcement purposes; and
3. “Single-source record” means a criminal history record from
this state that consists of an Oklahoma arrest record only. A
single-source record shall not contain any arrest from another
state, a federal arrest, or an entry into the National Sex Offender
Registry or a National Crime Information Center (NCIC)
wanted/warrant entry.
B. Beginning on the effective date of this act and subject to
the availability of funds, individuals with clean slate eligible
records shall be eligible to have their records sealed without
filing a court petition.
C. For purposes of determining if the waiting periods set forth
in paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section have been met, the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall only consider records
in its possession and shall deem sentences to have ended based on
the imposed sentence length information in its possession.
D. Records expunged pursuant to this section shall be partially
sealed so that such records are not available to the public but
remain available to law enforcement agencies for law enforcement
purposes.
E. Records expunged pursuant to this section shall be
admissible in any subsequent criminal prosecution to prove the
existence of a prior conviction or prior deferred judgment without
the necessity of a court order requesting the unsealing of the
records. Records expunged pursuant to paragraph 4 of subsection A
of Section 18 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes may also include
the sealing of Pardon and Parole Board records related to an
application for a pardon. Such records shall be sealed to the
public but not to the Pardon and Parole Board.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 19, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 292, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 19), is amended to read as follows:
Section 19. A. Any person qualified under Section 18 of this
title may petition the district court of the district in which the
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 8

arrest information pertaining to the person is located for the
sealing of all or any part of the record, including court records,
except basic identification information.
B. The process for the automatic expungement of a clean slate
eligible arrest record as defined in subsection C of Section 18 of
this title is as follows:
1. On a monthly basis, the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation shall identify arrest records which are clean slate
eligible by conducting a search of the criminal history repository
records of the Bureau;
2. The Bureau shall, on a monthly basis, provide a list of
clean slate eligible arrest records to the prosecuting agency and
the arresting agency;
3. The prosecuting agency, arresting agency, and the Bureau
may, no later than forty-five (45) days from the day on which the
notice described in paragraph 2 of this subsection is transmitted,
object to an automatic expungement and such objection shall be
transmitted to all parties. An objection may be made for any of the
following reasons:
a. after reviewing the agency record, the agency believes
the arrest record does not meet the definition of a
clean slate eligible arrest record,
b. the individual has not paid court-ordered restitution
to the victim, or
c. the agency has a reasonable belief, grounded in
supporting facts, that an individual with a clean
slate eligible arrest record is continuing to engage
in criminal activity, whether charged or not charged,
within or outside the state;
4. If an agency identified in paragraph 3 of this subsection
objects for a reason described in paragraph 3 of this subsection
within forty-five (45) days of the day on which the notice described
in paragraph 2 of this subsection is transmitted, the record shall
not be expunged. Once a year, the Bureau shall electronically
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 9

submit a report to the Legislature with a list of all cases where a
record was not expunged pursuant to this paragraph; and
5. After forty-five (45) days pass from the day on which the
notice described in paragraph 2 of this subsection is sent, the
Bureau shall provide to the courts a list of all cases where
responses from all parties were received and no parties objected.
The court shall review this list and provide to all agencies that
have criminal history records a signed expungement order for all
cases approved. Upon receipt of a signed expungement order, each
agency shall seal the relevant records.
The Bureau and the Supreme Court may promulgate rules to govern
the process for automatic expungement of records for a clean slate
eligible arrest record in accordance with this subsection.
C. 1. Nothing in this section precludes an individual from
filing a petition for expungement of records that are eligible for
automatic expungement under subsection C of Section 18 of this title
if an automatic expungement has not occurred pursuant to subsection
B of this section.
2. An individual does not have a cause of action for damages as
a result of the failure of the Bureau to identify an arrest record
as eligible for automatic expungement.
D. An automatic expungement granted under subsection B of this
section does not preclude an individual from requesting the
unsealing of records in accordance with subsection P of this
section.
E. Upon the filing of a petition or entering of a court order
as prescribed in subsection A of this section, the court shall set a
date for a hearing and shall provide thirty (30) days of notice of
the hearing to the prosecuting agency, the arresting agency, the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, and any other person or
agency whom the court has reason to believe may have relevant
information related to the sealing of such record.
F. C. If a petitioner requests expungement for multiple
offenses in one county, each of which would qualify for expungement
if processed sequentially, the expungements may be considered under
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 10

a single petition. The petitioner shall not be required to submit
multiple petitions to accomplish the sequential sealing of multiple
offenses in a single county.
G. D. Upon a finding that the harm to privacy of the person in
interest or dangers of unwarranted adverse consequences outweigh the
public interest in retaining the records, the court may order such
records, or any part thereof except basic identification
information, to be sealed. If the court finds that neither sealing
of the records nor maintaining of the records unsealed by the agency
would serve the ends of justice, the court may enter an appropriate
order limiting access to such records.
Any order entered under this subsection shall specify those
agencies to which such order shall apply. Any order entered
pursuant to this subsection may be appealed by the petitioner, the
prosecuting agency, the arresting agency, or the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation to the Supreme Court in accordance with the
rules of the Supreme Court. In all such appeals, the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation is a necessary party and must shall be given
notice of the appellate proceedings.
H. E. Upon the entry of an order to seal the records, or any
part thereof, or upon an automatic expungement described in
subsection B of this section, the subject official actions shall be
deemed never to have occurred, and the person in interest and all
criminal justice agencies may properly reply, upon any inquiry in
the matter, that no such action ever occurred and that no such
record exists with respect to such person.
I. F. Inspection of the records included in the order may
thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the
person in interest who is the subject of such records, the Attorney
General, or by the prosecuting agency and only to those persons and
for such purposes named in such petition.
J. G. Employers, educational institutions, state and local
government agencies, officials, and employees shall not, in any
application or interview or otherwise, require an applicant to
disclose any information contained in sealed records. An applicant
need not, in answer to any question concerning arrest and criminal
records, provide information that has been sealed, including any
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 11

reference to or information concerning such sealed information and
may state that no such action has ever occurred. Such an
application may not be denied solely because of the refusal of the
applicant to disclose arrest and criminal records information that
has been sealed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any application submitted to the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a handgun license
pursuant to Section 1290.18 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
K. H. All arrest and criminal records information existing
prior to May 14, 1987, except basic identification information, is
also subject to sealing in accordance with subsection G D of this
section.
L. I. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize
the physical destruction of any criminal justice records.
M. J. For the purposes of this section, sealed materials which
are recorded in the same document as unsealed material may be
recorded in a separate document, and sealed, then obliterated in the
original document.
N. K. For the purposes of this section, district court index
reference of sealed material shall be destroyed, removed, or
obliterated.
O. L. Any record ordered to be sealed pursuant to this section,
if not unsealed within ten (10) years of the expungement order, may
be obliterated or destroyed at the end of the ten-year period.
P. M. Subsequent to records being sealed as provided herein in
this section, the prosecuting agency, the arresting agency, the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, or other interested person
or agency may petition the court for an order unsealing such
records. Upon filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for
hearing, which hearing may be closed at the discretion of the court,
and shall provide thirty (30) days of notice to all interested
parties. If, upon hearing, the court determines that there has been
a change of conditions or that there is a compelling reason to
unseal the records, the court may order all or a portion of the
records unsealed.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 12

Q. N. Nothing herein shall in this section shall be construed
to prohibit the introduction of evidence regarding actions sealed
pursuant to the provisions of this section at any hearing or trial
for purposes of impeaching the credibility of a witness or as
evidence of character testimony pursuant to Section 2608 of Title 12
of the Oklahoma Statutes.
R. O. If a person qualifies for an expungement under the
provisions of paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 18 of this
title and the petition for expungement is granted by the court, the
court shall order the reimbursement of all filing fees and court
costs incurred by the petitioner as a result of filing the
expungement request.
S. P. If a person qualifies for an expungement under the
provisions of paragraph 3 or 4 of subsection A of Section 18 of this
title, the person may request a hearing be set within thirty (30)
days after the date of filing the petition for expungement. The
court shall grant the request for the hearing and shall provide a
notice of no less fewer than ten (10) days for said the hearing to
the prosecuting agency, the arresting agency, the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation, and any other person or agency whom the
court has reason to believe may have relevant information related to
the sealing of such record. Any order entered pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of
subsections F C through P M of this section.
T. Q. Any offense that has been expunged shall not be treated
as a prior offense in determining whether another offense qualifies
for an expungement under Section 18 of this title.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19d of Title 22, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. By November 1, 2026, the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation shall establish and maintain a publicly accessible
online portal for individuals to submit an expedited expungement
request for clean slate eligible records as defined in Section 2 of
this act, or records eligible under paragraph 16 of Section 18 of
Title 22.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 13

B. An expedited expungement request submitted through the
portal shall only require the individual to provide sufficient
personal identification information to allow the Bureau to locate
the relevant criminal history record and contact information,
including an electronic mail address or phone number, for
notification purposes.
C. The following steps shall be used to review and approve or
deny expedited expungement requests:
1. Upon receipt of an expedited expungement request, the Bureau
shall review the associated criminal history record to determine if
it meets the criteria for an expedited expungement request pursuant
to this subsection;
2. If the record is determined to be eligible based on a review
of Bureau records, the Bureau shall solicit a review by the
appropriate arresting and prosecuting agencies;
3. Upon confirmation of eligibility based upon the review of
both arresting and prosecuting agency records, the Bureau shall send
a request to the appropriate district court for consideration;
4. If expungement is approved by the court, the court shall
provide an order for expungement to the Bureau and any other record-
holding agency;
5. If the record is determined not to be eligible by any party,
the Bureau shall provide a written or electronic notice of rejection
to the individual, clearly stating the reason or reasons for
rejection; and
6. Upon sealing a record pursuant to this subsection, the
Bureau shall notify the individual, via the contact information
provided in the request, that the record has been sealed by the
Bureau and the courts.
D. On or before November 1, 2027, the Bureau shall begin
implementing the automatic process to identify and submit clean
slate eligible records for sealing without receiving a request. All
electronic records that are eligible for expungement through the
automated clean slate process on or after November 1, 2027, shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 14

identified and expunged through the automated clean slate process
before November 1, 2029, in accordance with a schedule to be
determined by the Bureau. Beginning in 2027, the Bureau shall
publish and electronically submit to the Legislature an annual
report that contains statistical data of the number of records that
were identified and sealed pursuant to the expedited and automatic
processes.
E. The automated process described in subsection D of this
section shall be as follows:
1. On a monthly basis, the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation shall identify records that are clean slate eligible
by conducting a search of the criminal history repository records of
the Bureau;
2. If the record is determined to be eligible pursuant to
Section 2 of this act based on a review of Bureau records, the
Bureau shall provide notice to be reviewed by the appropriate
arresting and prosecuting agencies;
3. The prosecuting agency, arresting agency, and the Bureau
may, no later than forty-five (45) days from the date on which the
notice described in paragraph 2 of this subsection is transmitted,
object to an automatic expungement. Such objection shall be
submitted in writing and transmitted to all parties. An objection
may be made for any of the following reasons:
a. after reviewing the agency record, the agency believes
the arrest record does not meet the definition of a
clean slate eligible arrest record,
b. the individual has not paid court-ordered restitution
to the victim, or
c. the agency has a reasonable belief, grounded in
supporting facts, that an individual with a clean
slate eligible arrest record is continuing to engage
in criminal activity, whether charged or not charged,
within or outside the state;
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 15

4. If an agency objects in accordance with the requirements of
paragraph 3 of this subsection, the record shall not be expunged;
5. If an agency does not object in accordance with the
requirements of paragraph 3 of this subsection, the objection shall
be waived, and the Bureau shall provide to the courts a list of all
cases where responses from all parties were received and no parties
objected. The court shall review such list, produce a signed
expungement order for all cases approved, and notify the Bureau.
The Bureau shall notify all agencies that have criminal history
records. Upon receipt of this notification, each agency shall
promptly seal the relevant records;
6. If an agency objects in accordance with the requirements of
paragraph 3 of this subsection, the Bureau shall provide to the
court a list of all cases with objections. The court may, in its
discretion, set the matter for hearing to consider any argument from
the objecting party as to why the applicable record does not qualify
for automatic expungement. The hearing shall be closed at the
request of the objecting party if there exists a reason to believe
the basis of the objection may impede or frustrate any ongoing
investigation. The court shall provide notice to the objecting
party of any hearing set in accordance with this section at least
thirty (30) days prior to the hearing. If the court finds that
there were insufficient grounds for the objection, the court may
order the applicable record expunged and provide notice to the
affected agencies to seal such records. The process for appeal of
any expungement order issued pursuant to this subsection shall be
the same as the process provided for in subsection D of Section 19
of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
7. The Bureau and the Supreme Court may promulgate rules to
govern the process for expungement of clean slate eligible records
in accordance with this subsection.
F. For purposes of this section, if expungement is approved,
the court shall provide an order for expungement to the Bureau and
any other record-holding agency. The court shall assign each order
a unique identification number for filing purposes. Orders pursuant
to this section shall begin with the prefix ‘AE’, identifying the
order with an automated or expedited expungement, followed by the
applicable year notification is received. Such record shall not be
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 16

a public record but shall be utilized for administrative purposes.
The courts shall transmit an electronic notification of any order
for expunged records to the Bureau or otherwise make such orders
available by secure electronic means. Upon receipt of a signed
expungement order, each agency shall seal the relevant records.
G. Nothing in this section precludes an individual from filing
a petition with the district court pursuant to Section 19 of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes for expungement of clean slate eligible
records.
H. An individual shall not have a cause of action for damages
if the Bureau fails to identify an arrest record as eligible for
expungement pursuant to this section.
I. An expungement granted under this section does not preclude
an individual from requesting the unsealing of records in accordance
with subsection M of Section 19 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
J. 1. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize
the physical destruction of any criminal justice records.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
introduction of evidence regarding actions sealed pursuant to the
provisions of this section at any hearing or trial.
K. The provisions and rights contained in subsections E, F, and
G of Section 18 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply to
records expunged pursuant to this section.
SECTION 5. REPEALER 22 O.S. 2021, Section 18, as last
amended by Section 12, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 18), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 17

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2030 Page 18